Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
PART 2 Local

3-5-80.
Levy and amount of tax.

Municipalities and counties permitting the sale of malt beverages shall impose an excise tax, in addition to the excise taxes levied by the state, as follows:

Where malt beverages, commonly known as tap or draft beer, are sold in or from a barrel or bulk container, a tax of $6.00 on each container sold containing not more than 15 1/2 gallons and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of 15 1/2 gallons;

Where malt beverages are sold in bottles, cans, or other containers, except barrel or bulk containers, a tax of 5¢ per 12 ounces and a proportionate tax at the same rate on all fractional parts of 12 ounces.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4731, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 47; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 3.

3-5-81.
Payment of tax by wholesale dealers generally; time of payment; reports by dealers as to quantities of beverages sold.

The excise taxes provided for in this part shall be imposed upon and shall be paid by the licensed wholesale dealer in malt beverages; provided, however, that such taxes shall be imposed upon and shall be paid by the licensed brewer for malt beverages served or sold by the brewer directly to the public pursuant to Code Section 3-5-24.1.

The taxes shall be paid on or before the tenth day of the month following the calendar month in which the beverages are sold or disposed of within the particular municipality or county.

Each licensee responsible for the payment of the excise tax shall file a report itemizing for the preceding calendar month the exact quantities of malt beverages, by size and type of container, sold during the month within each municipality or county. The licensee shall file the report with each municipality or county wherein the beverages are sold by the licensee.

The licensee shall remit to the municipality or county on the tenth day of the month following the calendar month in which the sales were made the tax imposed by the municipality or county.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4732, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 11/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, added the proviso at the end of subsection (a); deleted “by the wholesale dealer” following “or county” at the end of subsection (b); and substituted “licensee” for “wholesaler” near the beginning of subsection (d).

3-5-82.
Requirement of markings on containers.

No decal, stamp, or other marking shall be required on malt beverage containers designating the particular municipality or county in which a sale of malt beverages is made or in which resides a licensed retailer to whom the beverages are delivered.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4733, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-83.
Use of excess tax revenues by consolidated governments and certain counties.

Any tax revenue realized pursuant to this part by a consolidated government existing on July 1, 1981, which is in excess of the amount levied locally on December 1, 1972, shall be used to construct a convention center or to pay for the operation of a convention center.

Any tax revenue realized pursuant to this part by a county having a population of not less than 162,000 nor more than 165,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census or by any municipality in any such county, which is in excess of the amount levied locally on December 1, 1972, shall be used for the construction of a coliseum or civic center.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 328, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4735, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 48.

3-5-84.
Enforcement of part.

This part shall be enforced by the commissioner or by any municipality or county permitting the sale of malt beverages within its boundaries, especially with regard to collection and payment of the taxes provided for by this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1447, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 282, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4734, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.